en: Sport shoes
de: Sportschuhe
es: Zapatillas deportivas

da: Vandrestøvler
de: Wanderstiefel
es: Botas de senderismo
fr: Chaussures de sport, Chaussures de marche, Chaussures de randonnée
it: Scarponi da trekking
ja: ハイキングブーツ

en: Athletics
xx: Athletics
cs: Atletické sporty
da: Atletik
de: Athletik
es: Equipamiento para atletismo
fr: Divers sports
it: Sport
ja: スポーツ競技
nl: Lichaamssporten
no: Idrett
pl: Sport
pt: Artigos para prática de esportes
ru: Товары для атлетических видов спорта
sv: Idrott och sport
tr: Spor Ekipmanları

en: American Football
xx: American Football
cs: Americký fotbal
da: Amerikansk fodbold
de: American Football
es: Fútbol americano
fr: Football américain
it: Football
ja: アメフト用品
nl: American football
no: Amerikansk fotball
pl: Futbol amerykański
pt: Futebol americano
ru: Американский футбол
sv: Amerikansk fotboll
tr: Amerikan Futbolu

en: American Football Gloves
xx: American Football Gloves
cs: Rukavice na americký fotbal
da: Amerikansk fodbold-handsker
de: American Football-Handschuhe
es: Guantes de fútbol americano
fr: Gants de football américain
it: Guanti da football
ja: アメフト用グローブ
nl: American football-handschoenen
no: Hansker til amerikansk fotball
pl: Rękawice do futbolu amerykańskiego
pt: Luvas de futebol americano
ru: Перчатки для американского футбола
sv: Handskar för amerikansk fotboll
tr: Amerikan Futbolu Eldivenleri

en: American Football Goal Posts
xx: American Football Goal Posts
cs: Brány na americký fotbal
da: Amerikansk fodbold-målstænger
de: American Football-Torstangen
es: Postes de fútbol americano
fr: Poteaux de but de football américain
it: Pali mete da football
ja: アメフト用ゴールポスト
nl: American football-doelpalen
no: Målstenger for amerikansk fotball
pl: Słupki do futbolu amerykańskiego
pt: Traves da goleira de futebol americano
ru: Штанги ворот для американского футбола
sv: Målstolpar för amerikansk fotboll
tr: Amerikan Futbolu Kaleleri

en: American Football Kicking Tees & Holders
xx: American Football Kicking Tees & Holders
cs: Vykopávací podložky na americký fotbal
da: Kicking tees og -holdere til amerikansk fodbold
de: Kicking Tees & Halter für Fußbälle
es: Tees de fútbol americano
fr: Tees et holders de football américain
it: Supporti e sostegni per palloni da rugby
ja: アメフト用キックティー
nl: Kicking tees en balhouders voor American football
no: Ballholdere for amerikansk fotball
pl: Podstawki do wykopywania piłki
pt: Suportes para bola de futebol americano
ru: Подставки для мяча для американского футбола
sv: Kicking tees för amerikansk fotboll
tr: Amerikan Futbolu Kicking Tee'leri ve Tutucuları

en: American Football Protective Gear
xx: American Football Protective Gear
cs: Ochranné pomůcky na americký fotbal
da: Beskyttelsesudstyr til amerikansk fodbold
de: American Football-Schutzbekleidung
es: Equipo de protección de fútbol americano
fr: Protections de football américain
it: Attrezzatura protettiva football
ja: アメフト用プロテクター
nl: Beschermende uitrusting voor American football
no: Beskyttelsesutstyr for amerikansk fotball
pl: Ochraniacze do futbolu amerykańskiego
pt: Equipamento de proteção de futebol americano
ru: Защитное оснащение для американского футбола
sv: Skyddsutrustning för amerikansk fotboll
tr: Amerikan Futbolu Koruyucu Ekipmanları

en: American Football Girdles
xx: American Football Girdles
cs: Vnitřní kalhoty na americký fotbal
da: Amerikansk fodbold-bælter
de: American Football-Girdle Shorts
es: Protección inferior de fútbol americano
fr: Gaines de football américain
it: Imbottiture protettive football
ja: アメフト用ガードル
nl: American football-girdles
no: Polstrede bukser
pl: Spodenki do futbolu amerykańskiego
pt: Cinto da calça de futebol americano
ru: Защитные пояса для американского футбола
sv: Byxskydd för amerikansk fotboll
tr: Amerikan Futbolu Korseleri

en: American Football Helmet Accessories
xx: American Football Helmet Accessories
cs: Přilby na americký fotbal – příslušenství
da: Amerikansk fodbold-hjelme – tilbehør
de: American Football-Helmzubehör
es: Accesorios del casco de fútbol americano
fr: Accessoires pour casques de football américain
it: Accessori caschi football
ja: アメフト用ヘルメット関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor American football-helmen
no: Tilbehør til fotballhjelmer
pl: Akcesoria do kasków do futbolu amerykańskiego
pt: Acessórios do capacete de futebol americano
ru: Принадлежности для шлемов для американского футбола
sv: Hjälmtillbehör för amerikansk fotboll
tr: Amerikan Futbolu Kaskı Aksesuarları

en: American Football Chin Straps
xx: American Football Chin Straps
cs: Chrániče brady na americký fotbal
da: Amerikansk fodbold-hageremme
de: American Football-Kinnriemen
es: Barboquejos de fútbol americano
fr: Jugulaires de football américain
it: Cinghie football per mento
ja: アメフト用チンストラップ
nl: Kinbanden voor American football
no: Fotball-hakestropper
pl: Pasek podbródkowy
pt: Tiras que amarram o capacete de futebol americano
ru: Предметы защиты подбородка для американского футбола
sv: Hakremmar för amerikansk fotboll
tr: Amerikan Futbolu Çene Kayışları

en: American Football Face Masks
xx: American Football Face Masks
cs: Masky na americký fotbal
da: Amerikansk fodbold-ansigtsmasker
de: American Football-Facemasks
es: Máscaras de fútbol americano
fr: Grilles de casque de football américain
it: Maschere da football
ja: アメフト用フェイスマスク
nl: Gezichtsmaskers voor American football
no: Fotball-ansiktsmasker
pl: Maski do futbolu amerykańskiego
pt: Máscaras para futebol americano
ru: Защитные маски для американского футбола
sv: Hjälmgaller för amerikansk fotboll
tr: Amerikan Futbolu Yüz Maskeleri

en: American Football Helmet Padding
xx: American Football Helmet Padding
cs: Vycpávky přileb na americký fotbal
da: Amerikansk fodbold-hjelmpuder
de: American Football-Helmpolster
es: Almohadilla del casco de fútbol americano
fr: Protections pour casque de football américain
it: Imbottiture casco football
ja: アメフト用ヘルメットパッド
nl: Vulling voor American football-helmen
no: Fotballhjelm-polstring
pl: Wyściółki do kasków do futbolu amerykańskiego
pt: Acolchoamento do capacete de futebol americano
ru: Накладки на шлемы для американского футбола
sv: Hjälmstoppning för amerikansk fotboll
tr: Amerikan Futbolu Kask Süngeri

en: American Football Helmet Visors
xx: American Football Helmet Visors
cs: Hledí přileb na americký fotbal
da: Amerikansk fodbold-hjelmvisirer
de: American Football-Helmvisiere
es: Viseras del casco de fútbol americano
fr: Visières pour casques de football américain
it: Visori caschi da football
ja: アメフト用ヘルメットバイザー
nl: Masker voor American football-helmen
no: Fotballhjelm-visirer
pl: Osłony oczu do kasków do futbolu amerykańskiego
pt: Visores do capacete de futebol americano
ru: Защитные козырьки на шлемы для американского футбола
sv: Hjälmvisir för amerikansk fotboll
tr: Amerikan Futbolu Kask Vizörleri

en: American Football Helmets
xx: American Football Helmets
cs: Přilby na americký fotbal
da: Amerikansk fodbold-hjelme
de: American Football-Helme
es: Cascos de fútbol americano
fr: Casques de football américain
it: Caschi da football
ja: アメフト用ヘルメット
nl: American football-helmen
no: Fotballhjelmer
pl: Kaski do futbolu amerykańskiego
pt: Capacetes de futebol americano
ru: Шлемы для американского футбола
sv: Hjälmar för amerikansk fotboll
tr: Amerikan Futbolu Kaskları

en: American Football Neck Rolls
xx: American Football Neck Rolls
cs: Krční chrániče na americký fotbal
da: Amerikansk fodbold-nakkebeskyttere
de: American Football-Nackenschutz
es: Protección de cuello de fútbol americano
fr: Protège-cervicales de football américain
it: Imbottiture football per collo
ja: アメフト用ネックロール
nl: Nekbeschermers voor American football
no: Nakkebeskyttelser
pl: Ochraniacze szyi do futbolu amerykańskiego
pt: Rolo de pescoço no futebol americano
ru: Накладки на шею для американского футбола
sv: Halsskydd för amerikansk fotboll
tr: Amerikan Futbolu Boyunlukları

en: American Football Rib Protection Shirts & Vests
xx: American Football Rib Protection Shirts & Vests
cs: Trika a vesty s ochranou žeber na americký fotbal
da: Trøjer og veste med brystbeskyttelse til amerikansk fodbold
de: Schutz-Shirts und -Hemden
es: Chalecos y camisetas con protección de costillas para fútbol americano
fr: Maillots et protège-sternum
it: Maglie con protezioni per le costole per football
ja: アメフト用リブパッド付きシャツ・ベスト
nl: Ribbeschermingsshirts en -vesten voor American football
no: Brystbeskyttelse for amerikansk fotball – skjorter og vester
pl: Ochraniacze żeber do futbolu amerykańskiego
pt: Camisas e coletes de proteção para futebol americano
ru: Защитные майки и жилеты для американского футбола
sv: Vadderade revbensskydd för amerikansk fotboll
tr: Amerikan Futbolu Kaburga Koruyucu Gömlekleri ve Yelekleri

en: American Football Shoulder Pads
xx: American Football Shoulder Pads
cs: Ramenní chrániče na americký fotbal
da: Amerikansk fodbold-skulderpuder
de: American Football-Schulterpads
es: Hombreras de fútbol americano
fr: Épaulières de football américain
it: Imbottiture football per spalle
ja: アメフト用ショルダーパッド
nl: Shoulderpads voor American football
no: Skulderputer
pl: Naramienniki do futbolu amerykańskiego
pt: Ombreiras de futebol americano
ru: Накладки на плечи для американского футбола
sv: Axelskydd för amerikansk fotboll
tr: Amerikan Futbolu Omuzlukları

en: American Football Training Equipment
xx: American Football Training Equipment
cs: Tréninkové vybavení na americký fotbal
da: Amerikansk fodbold-træningsudstyr
de: American Football-Trainingsausrüstung
es: Equipo de entrenamiento de fútbol americano
fr: Matériel d'entraînement de football américain
it: Attrezzatura allenamento football
ja: アメフト練習器具
nl: Benodigdheden voor American football-training
no: Treningsutstyr for amerikansk fotball
pl: Sprzęt treningowy do futbolu amerykańskiego
pt: Equipamento de treinamento de futebol americano
ru: Тренировочная форма для американского футбола
sv: Träningsutrustning för amerikansk fotboll
tr: Amerikan Futbolu Antrenman Ekipmanları

en: American Football Dummies & Sleds
xx: American Football Dummies & Sleds
cs: Figuríny a sledy na americký fotbal
da: Dummies og slæder til amerikansk fodbold
de: Dummys & Schlitten
es: Muñecos y trineos de arrastre para fútbol americano
fr: Mannequins et traîneaux de blocage
it: Manichini e slitte per football
ja: アメフト用タックルダミー・スレッド
nl: Dummy's en blocking sleds voor American football
no: Takledukker og sleder for amerikansk fotball
pl: Tarcze i słupy do futbolu amerykańskiego
pt: Obstáculos e trenós para futebol americano
ru: Манекены и тележки для американского футбола
sv: Dummies för amerikansk fotboll
tr: Amerikan Futbolu Mankenleri ve Sled'leri